Utah statutes.
23-14-18.   Establishment of seasons, locations, limits, and regulations by
Wildlife Board.
(1)  To provide an adequate and flexible system of protection, propagation,
introduction, increase, control, harvest, management, and conservation of
protected wildlife in this state and to provide for the use and development of
protected wildlife for public recreation and food supply while maintaining a
sustainable population of protected wildlife, the Wildlife Board shall
determine  the circumstances, time, location, means, and the amounts, and
numbers of protected wildlife which may be taken.
(2)  The Wildlife Board shall, except as otherwise specified in this code:
(a)  fix seasons and shorten, extend, or close seasons on any species of
protected wildlife in any locality, or in the entire state, if the board finds
that the action is necessary to effectuate proper wildlife management and
control;
(b)  close or open areas to fishing, trapping, or hunting;
(c)  establish refuges and preserves;
(d)  regulate and prescribe the means by which protected wildlife may be
taken;
(e)  regulate the transportation and storage of protected wildlife, or their
parts, within the boundaries of the state and the shipment or transportation
out of the state;
(f)  establish or change bag limits and possession limits;
(g)  prescribe safety measures and establish other regulations as may be
considered necessary in the interest of wildlife conservation and the safety
and welfare of hunters, trappers, fishermen, landowners, and the public;
(h) (i)  prescribe when licenses, permits, tags, and certificates of
registration shall be required and procedures for their issuance and use; and
(ii)  establish forms and fees for licenses, permits, tags, and certificates
of registration; and
(i)  prescribe rules and regulations as it may consider necessary to control
the use and harvest of protected wildlife by private associations, clubs,
partnerships, or corporations, provided the rules and regulations do not
preclude the landowner from personally controlling trespass upon the owner's
properties nor from charging a fee to trespass for purposes of hunting or
fishing.
(3)  The Wildlife Board may allow a season on protected wildlife to commence
on any day of the week except Sunday.
(4)  The Wildlife Board shall establish fees for licenses, permits, tags, and
certificates of registration in accordance with Section 63J-1-504.
